Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.370

Suspense account—Disbursements—Vouchers—Warrants.

Disbursement from the suspense account (not to exceed receipts), shall be by warrant issued against the account by the state treasurer, upon a properly authenticated voucher presented by the state department or office which deposited the moneys in the account.

[ 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.370. Prior: 1955 c 226 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 2nd ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 43.30.325.